Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2963
Meetings.

(1) The board of directors shall meet at least annually and may hold meetings in or outside this state.

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, the board of directors may permit directors to attend board meetings or conduct board meetings through the use of any means of communication, if all directors attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 63.